Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-117 Stay of proceedings. (a)
All proceedings in which the insolvent insurer is a party, or is obligated to
defend a party in any court in this State, subject to waiver by the association
in specific cases involving covered claims, shall be stayed for up to six
months, and any additional time thereafter as may be determined by the court,
from the date the insolvency is determined or an ancillary proceeding is
instituted in the State, whichever is later, to permit proper defense by the
association of all pending causes of action. As to any covered claims arising
from a judgment or under any decision, verdict, or finding based on the default
of the insolvent insurer or its failure to defend an insured, the association,
either on its own behalf or on behalf of the insured, may apply to have such
judgment, order, decision, verdict, or finding set aside by the same court,
administrator, or other entity that made the judgment, order, decision,
verdict, or finding and shall be permitted to defend the claim on the merits.

(b) The liquidator, receiver, or statutory
successor of an insolvent insurer covered by this part shall permit access by
the board of directors or its authorized representative to the insolvent
insurer's claim records that are necessary for the board in carrying out its
functions under this part with regard to covered claims. In addition, the
liquidator, receiver, or statutory successor shall provide the board of
directors or its representative with copies of those records upon the request
by the board and at the expense of the board. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L
2000, c 93, §14; am L 2004, c 122, §73]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next